Utah statutes.
41-6a-1610.   Spot lamps.
(1)  A motor vehicle may not be equipped with more than two spot lamps.
(2)  A lighted spot lamp may not be aimed or used so that any part of the high
intensity portion of the beam strikes the windshield, or any windows, mirror,
or occupant of another vehicle in use.
(3)  This section does not apply to spot lamps on an authorized emergency
vehicle.
